District of Columbia statutes.
16-4422

Confirmation of award.

After a party to an arbitration proceeding receives notice of an award, the party may make a motion to the court for an order confirming the award at which time the court shall issue a confirming order unless the award is modified or corrected pursuant to § 16-4420 or 16-4424 or is vacated pursuant to § 16-4423.

History

Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-111, § 2(b), 55 DCR 1847

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-4404, § 16-4418, § 16-4420, § 16-4421, and § 16-4425.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 22 of the Uniform Arbitration Act (2000).